Wyoming, session 2026, HB0140.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-1-513 and 18-5-209 are created to
read:

15-1-513. Third party building permit inspections.

(a) As used in this section:

HB0140

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0463
(i) "Building permit inspection" means an
on-site examination of work performed under a building
permit for the purpose of determining compliance with the
applicable building codes, construction standards, local
ordinances, permit conditions or approval plans that the
local enforcement authority is authorized to administer or
enforce. "Building permit inspection" shall not include:

(A) Any inspection required by law to be
performed by the state;

(B) Final inspections required for issuance
of a certificate of occupancy.

(ii) "Delivered by electronic means" includes
delivery to an electronic mail address, submission through
an electronic permitting system or online portal or
delivery by any other electronic method approved by the
local enforcement authority;

(iii) "Local enforcement authority" means the
city or town, including a building official, department,
employee, contractor or any other person designated or
HB0140

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0463
authorized by the city or town to administer or enforce
building codes or building permit requirements;

(iv) "Third party inspector" means an architect
licensed under title 33, chapter 4 of the Wyoming statutes,
a professional engineer licensed under title 33, chapter 29
of the Wyoming statutes or a person certified by the
International Code Council or the local enforcement
authority who performs building permit inspections and who
meets any additional qualification standards adopted by the
local enforcement authority. "Third party inspector" shall
not include:

(A) A person who prepared, stamped, signed
or was professionally responsible for the plans or
specifications for the work being inspected;

(B) A person who is an employee of or
otherwise affiliated with or financially interested in the
owner, developer, contractor or any person performing the
work being inspected.

HB0140

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0463
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an
owner of a building or structure, or the owner's
contractor, upon written authorization from the owner, may
retain, at the owner's expense, a third party inspector to
perform building permit inspections for that building or
structure.

(c) If an owner or a contractor retains a third party
inspector for building permit inspections under subsection
(b) of this section, the owner or contractor shall provide
written notice to the local enforcement authority:

(i) At the time of filing the building permit
application that a third party inspector will perform all
required building permit inspections; or

(ii) Before each scheduled inspection by the
local enforcement authority, not later than the deadline
established by the local enforcement authority, that a
third party inspector will perform that required building
permit inspection.

HB0140

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0463
(d) The written notice required under subsection (c)
of this section shall identify the name of the third party
inspector and the inspection or inspections that the third
party inspector will perform. The written notice required
under subsection (c) of this section may be delivered by
electronic means.

(e) The owner or contractor shall provide written
notice to the local enforcement authority of any changes in
the building permit inspections to be performed by the
third party inspector not later than the deadline
established by the local enforcement authority. The written
notice required under this subsection may be delivered by
electronic means.

(f) Each third party inspector shall provide a copy
of each inspection report to the local enforcement
authority not later than the deadline established by the
local enforcement authority. Each local enforcement
authority may establish minimum requirements for inspection
reports submitted under this subsection. The inspection
report required under this subsection may be delivered by
electronic means. Not later than the deadline established
HB0140

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0463
by the local enforcement authority after receipt of the
inspection report, the local enforcement authority shall
accept the inspection report.

(g) Each local enforcement authority shall establish
and publish deadlines and requirements for all notices and
inspection reports required under this section.

(h) Each third party inspector shall maintain
liability insurance as follows:

(i) A third party inspector who is an architect
licensed under title 33, chapter 4 of the Wyoming statutes
or a professional engineer licensed under title 33, chapter
29 of the Wyoming statutes shall maintain professional
liability insurance in an amount of not less than one
million dollars ($1,000,000.00) per claim;

(ii) A third party inspector who is certified by
the International Code Council or the local enforcement
authority shall maintain general liability insurance in an
amount of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)
per claim.
HB0140

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0463

(j) Not later than the deadline established by the
local enforcement authority, each third party inspector
shall provide written notice of the third party inspector's
insurance coverage as required under subsection (h) of this
section, including the insurer and the insurance coverage
amount.

(k) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize any third party inspector to issue a certificate
of occupancy. A certificate of occupancy shall only be
issued by the local enforcement authority. A local
enforcement authority may rely on third party inspection
reports to the extent the inspection reports were not
rejected by the local enforcement authority and the
inspection reports relate to inspections other than the
final inspection required for issuance of a certificate of
occupancy. The final inspection for a certificate of
occupancy shall be performed by the local enforcement
authority.

18-5-209. Third party building permit inspections.

HB0140

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0463
(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Building permit inspection" means an
on-site examination of work performed under a building
permit for the purpose of determining compliance with the
applicable building codes, construction standards, local
ordinances, permit conditions or approval plans that the
local enforcement authority is authorized to administer or
enforce. "Building permit inspection" shall not include:

(A) Any inspection required by law to be
performed by the state;

(B) Final inspections required for issuance
of a certificate of occupancy.

(ii) "Delivered by electronic means" includes
delivery to an electronic mail address, submission through
an electronic permitting system or online portal or
delivery by any other electronic method approved by the
local enforcement authority;

HB0140

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0463
(iii) "Local enforcement authority" means the
county, including a building official, department,
employee, contractor or any other person designated or
authorized by the county to administer or enforce building
codes or building permit requirements;

(iv) "Third party inspector" means an architect
licensed under title 33, chapter 4 of the Wyoming statutes,
a professional engineer licensed under title 33, chapter 29
of the Wyoming statutes or a person certified by the
International Code Council or the local enforcement
authority who performs building permit inspections and who
meets any additional qualification standards adopted by the
local enforcement authority. "Third party inspector" shall
not include:

(A) A person who prepared, stamped, signed
or was professionally responsible for the plans or
specifications for the work being inspected;

(B) A person who is an employee of or
otherwise affiliated with or financially interested in the
HB0140

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0463
owner, developer, contractor or any person performing the
work being inspected.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an
owner of a building or structure, or the owner's
contractor, upon written authorization from the owner, may
retain, at the owner's expense, a third party inspector to
perform building permit inspections for that building or
structure.

(c) If an owner or a contractor retains a third party
inspector for building permit inspections under subsection
(b) of this section, the owner or contractor shall provide
written notice to the local enforcement authority:

(i) At the time of filing the building permit
application that a third party inspector will perform all
required building permit inspections; or

(ii) Before each scheduled inspection by the
local enforcement authority, not later than the deadline
established by the local enforcement authority, that a
HB0140

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0463
third party inspector will perform that required building
permit inspection.

(d) The written notice required under subsection (c)
of this section shall identify the name of the third party
inspector and the inspection or inspections that the third
party inspector will perform. The written notice required
under subsection (c) of this section may be delivered by
electronic means.

(e) The owner or contractor shall provide written
notice to the local enforcement authority of any changes in
the building permit inspections to be performed by the
third party inspector not later than the deadline
established by the local enforcement authority. The written
notice required under this subsection may be delivered by
electronic means.

(f) Each third party inspector shall provide a copy
of each inspection report to the local enforcement
authority not later than the deadline established by the
local enforcement authority. Each local enforcement
authority may establish minimum requirements for inspection
HB0140

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0463
reports submitted under this subsection. The inspection
report required under this subsection may be delivered by
electronic means. Not later than the deadline established
by the local enforcement authority after receipt of the
inspection report, the local enforcement authority shall
accept the inspection report.

(g) Each local enforcement authority shall establish
and publish deadlines and requirements for all notices and
inspection reports required under this section.

(h) Each third party inspector shall maintain
liability insurance as follows:

(i) A third party inspector who is an architect
licensed under title 33, chapter 4 of the Wyoming statutes
or a professional engineer licensed under title 33, chapter
29 of the Wyoming statutes shall maintain professional
liability insurance in an amount of not less than one
million dollars ($1,000,000.00) per claim;

(ii) A third party inspector who is certified by
the International Code Council or the local enforcement
HB0140

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0463
authority shall maintain general liability insurance in an
amount of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)
per claim.

(j) Not later than the deadline established by the
local enforcement authority, each third party inspector
shall provide written notice of the third party inspector's
insurance coverage as required under subsection (h) of this
section, including the insurer and the insurance coverage
amount.

(k) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize any third party inspector to issue a certificate
of occupancy. A certificate of occupancy shall only be
issued by the local enforcement authority. A local
enforcement authority may rely on third party inspection
reports to the extent the inspection reports were not
rejected by the local enforcement authority and the
inspection reports relate to inspections other than the
final inspection required for issuance of a certificate of
occupancy. The final inspection for a certificate of
occupancy shall be performed by the local enforcement
authority.
HB0140

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0463

Section 2. This act shall apply to building permit
applications filed on or after July 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0140